Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF650.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2428HV (1) 91 th/ns H.F. 650 Section 1. Section 309.17, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 309.17 Engineer ââ term. 3 The board of supervisors shall employ one or more licensed 4 civil engineers as county engineers. However, the board 5 may employ a professional engineering entity as the county 6 engineer, with one or more licensed civil engineers employed by 7 the entity responsible for performing the duties required of 8 the county engineer, pursuant to an agreement between the board 9 and the entity. The board shall fix the term of employment for 10 county engineers, which shall not exceed three years, but the 11 tenure of office may be terminated at any time by the board. 12 Sec. 2. Section 309.18, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 13 to read as follows: 14 2. The county engineers shall, in the performance of their 15 duties, work under the directions of the board and shall give 16 bonds for the faithful performance of their duties in a sum not 17 less than two thousand nor more than five thousand dollars, to 18 be approved by the board. The board shall approve a bond given 19 by a professional engineering entity employed as the county 20 engineer, which covers the entityâs licensed civil engineers, 21 as if the entity was one licensed civil engineer. 22